Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.390

Service of process, notice, or demand on corporation.

Service of any process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4125; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 78.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.